West Virginia, session 2026, HB4704.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 15. Consumer Sales and Service Tax. §11-15-9v. Exemption for sales of daylight fluorescent outerwear. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, the sale of outerwear in daylight fluorescent orange or blaze orange, sold and marketed for the purpose of hunter's safety, is exempted from the taxes imposed by this article and by §11-15A-1, et seq. during the first two weeks in November.